Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Standards of Conduct

§ 17-19-830.
Directors' standards and liabilities.

A director shall not be deemed to be a trustee with respect to the corporation or with respect to any property held or administered by the corporation, including without limit, property that may be subject to restrictions imposed by the donor or transferor of such property.

Members of a board of any nonprofit corporation organized under this act are not individually liable for any actions, inactions or omissions by the nonprofit corporation. This subsection does not affect individual liability for intentional torts or illegal acts. This subsection also does not prevent removal of a board member by court order pursuant to W.S.

17-19-810

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 17-19-831.
Director conflict of interest.

A conflict of interest transaction is a transaction with the corporation in which a director of the corporation has a direct or indirect interest. A conflict of interest transaction is not voidable if the transaction was fair at the time it was entered into or is approved as provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section.

A transaction in which a director of a public benefit or religious corporation has a conflict of interest may be approved:

In advance by the vote of the board of directors or a committee of the board if:

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest are disclosed or known to the board or committee of the board; and

The directors approving the transaction in good faith reasonably believe that the transaction is fair to the corporation; or

Before or after it is consummated by obtaining approval of the:

Attorney general; or

District court in an action in which the attorney general is joined as a party.

A transaction in which a director of a mutual benefit corporation has a conflict of interest may be approved if:

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the board of directors or a committee of the board and the board or committee of the board authorized, approved or ratified the transaction; or

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the members and they authorized, approved or ratified the transaction.

For purposes of this section, a director of the corporation has an indirect interest in a transaction if:

Another entity in which the director has a material interest or in which the director is a general partner is a party to the transaction; or

Another entity of which the director is a director, officer or trustee is a party to the transaction.

For purposes of subsections (b) and (c) of this section a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved or ratified, if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors on the board or on the committee, who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction, but a transaction shall not be authorized, approved or ratified under this section by a single director. If a majority of the directors on the board who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction vote to authorize, approve or ratify the transaction, a quorum is present for the purpose of taking action under this section. The presence of, or a vote cast by, a director with a direct or indirect interest in the transaction does not affect the validity of any action taken under paragraph (b)(i) or (c)(i) of this section if the transaction is otherwise approved as provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section.

For purposes of paragraph (c)(ii) of this section, a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved or ratified by the members if it receives a majority of the votes entitled to be counted under this subsection. Votes cast by or voted under the control of a director who has a direct or indirect interest in the transaction, and votes cast by or voted under the control of an entity described in paragraph (d)(i) of this section, shall not be counted in a vote of members to determine whether to authorize, approve or ratify a conflict of interest transaction under paragraph (c)(ii) of this section. The vote of these members, however, is counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other sections of this act. A majority of the voting power, whether or not present, that are entitled to be counted in a vote on the transaction under this subsection constitutes a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this section.

The articles, bylaws or a resolution of the board may impose additional requirements on conflict of interest transactions.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the next-to-last sentence in subsection (f), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

Procedural requirements.

Foundation was entitled to summary judgment on a director’s judicial dissolution claim based on deadlock, based on an alleged conflict of interest, because (1) the director had to first bring a derivative action to void the election of one of three directors, (2) the director did not comply with this requirement, and (3) there were thus three directors, so there could be no deadlock. Sullivan v. Pike & Susan Sullivan Found., 2018 WY 19, 412 P.3d 306,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2018).

No conflict of interest where director was furthering the association's business. —

There was no conflict of interest on the part of the corporation director under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

17-19-831

by claiming reimbursement of expenses to the director's law firm because the director was not conducting business with the association; rather he incurred the expenses while furthering the association's business in his capacity as director. Mueller v. Zimmer, 2005 WY 156, 124 P.3d 340,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2005).

§ 17-19-832.
Loans to or guaranties for directors and officers.

A corporation shall not lend money to nor guarantee the obligation of a director or officer of the corporation except as provided in W.S.

17-19-853

.

The fact that a loan or guarantee is made in violation of this section does not affect the borrower’s liability on the loan.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.